Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 8. Dissolution

§ 3471.
Nonjudicial dissolution.

A limited partnership is dissolved and its affairs shall be wound up upon the happening of the first to occur of the following:

at the time specified in the certificate of limited partnership;

upon the happening of events specified in writing in the partnership agreement;

written consent of all partners;

an event of withdrawal of a general partner unless at the time there is at least one other general partner and the written provisions of the partnership agreement permit the business of the limited partnership to be carried on by the remaining general partner and that partner does so, but the limited partnership is not dissolved and is not required to be wound up by reason of any event of withdrawal if, within 90 days after the withdrawal, all partners agree in writing to continue the business of the limited partnership and to the appointment of one or more additional general partners if necessary or desired; or

entry of a decree of judicial dissolution under section 3472 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 3472.
Judicial dissolution.

On application by or for a partner the Superior Court may decree dissolution of a limited partnership whenever it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in conformity with the partnership agreement. Venue for such a proceeding lies in the county where the partnership’s principal office is or was located.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 3473.
Winding up.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, the general partners who have not wrongfully dissolved a limited partnership or, if none, the limited partners, may wind up the limited partnership’s affairs; but the Superior Court may wind up the limited partnership’s affairs upon application of any partner, his or her legal representative, or assignee. Venue for such a proceeding lies in the county where the partnership’s principal office is or was located.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 3474.
Distribution of assets.

Upon the winding up of a limited partnership, the assets shall be distributed as follows:

to creditors, including partners who are creditors, to the extent permitted by law, in satisfaction of liabilities of the limited partnership other than liabilities for distributions to partners under section 3451 or 3454 of this title;

except as provided in the partnership agreement, to partners and former partners in satisfaction of liabilities for distributions under section 3451 or 3454 of this title; and

except as provided in the partnership agreement, to partners first for the return of their contributions and secondly respecting their partnership interests, in the proportions in which the partners share in distributions.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.